test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ciekkes_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - cieʹǩǩes e-stem pöly: # Noun "pykälä (korvamerkissä)" - full paradigm
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: cieʹǩǩes
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: ceäkˈkaz
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: ceäkˈkaz
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: ceäkˈksa
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: ceäkˈksest
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Com+Indef: ceäkˈksin
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Ess+Indef: ceäkˈksen
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Par+Indef: ceäkˈksed
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [ceäkˈkaztaa, ceäkˈkaztää]
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ceäkˈkaz
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: ceäkˈksi
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: ceäkˈksid
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: ceäkˈksid
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: ceäkˈksin
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Pl+Com+Indef: ceäkˈksivuiʹm
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [ceäkˈksitaa, ceäkˈksitää]
